Tennessee, session 114, SB1417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-609, is amended by designating
the current language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new subsection:
(b)
(1) A school support organization and a group or organization that
collects and raises money, materials, property, or securities while representing
itself to be a school support organization shall annually provide a detailed report
of the organization's receipts and expenditures while representing itself to be a
school support organization to the department of education by July 1 each year,
unless the school support organization is a booster club, parent teacher
association, parent teacher organization, or parent teacher support association.
(2) The department shall publish a report submitted to the department
pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) for a period of at least three (3) years from the date
by which the report was submitted to the department.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1417
003032
- 1 -